Vermont statutes. Title 15A Adoption Act
Chapter 8. Interstate Compacts on Adoption and Medical Assistance

§ 8-101.
Interstate compacts on adoption and medical assistance; authorization.

The Commissioner of the Department for Children and Families is authorized to negotiate and enter into interstate compacts with agencies of other states for the provision of medical assistance and other services for children with special needs on behalf of whom adoption assistance is being provided by the State of Vermont or another state party to such a compact and who move into or from Vermont.

As used in this article, “state” includes a state, territory, possession, or commonwealth of the United States. Compacts authorized by this article must include:

a provision making it available for joinder by all states;

a provision or provisions for withdrawal from the compact upon written notice to the parties, but with a period of one year between the date of the notice and the effective date of the withdrawal;

a requirement that the protections afforded by or pursuant to the compact continue in force for the duration of the adoption assistance and be applicable to all children and their adoptive parents who on the effective date of the withdrawal are receiving adoption assistance from a party state other than the one in which they are resident and have their principal place of abode;

a requirement that each instance of adoption assistance to which the compact applies be covered by an adoption assistance agreement in writing between the adoptive parents and the state child welfare agency of the state that undertakes to provide the adoption assistance, and further, that any such agreement be expressly for the benefit of the adopted child and enforceable by the adoptive parents and the state agency providing the adoption assistance; and

such other provisions as may be appropriate to implement the proper administration of the compact.

The Commissioner shall designate a compact administrator and deputies, as deemed necessary, who shall have authority to develop rules to be adopted to effectuate the terms and provisions of compacts entered into under the authority of this article.

HISTORY:

Added

2005, No. 215

(Adj. Sess.), § 127.